src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-vaagge_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - vágge: # N_EVEN_NOCG (no CG or umlaut, but VH)
    vágge+N+Sg+Nom: vágge
    vágge+N+Sg+Gen: vágge
    vágge+N+Sg+Acc: vággev
    vágge+N+Sg+Ill: vággáj
    vágge+N+Sg+Ine: vággen
    vágge+N+Sg+Ela: [vággest, vágges]
    vágge+N+Sg+Com: [väggijn, väggijna]
    vágge+N+Pl+Nom: vágge
    vágge+N+Pl+Gen: väggij
    vágge+N+Pl+Acc: väggijt
    vágge+N+Pl+Ill: väggijda
    vágge+N+Pl+Ine: väggijn
    vágge+N+Pl+Ela: [väggijst, väggijs]
    vágge+N+Pl+Com: [väggij, väggijgum]
    vágge+N+Ess: vággen
    vágge+N+Abe: vággedak
